District of Columbia statutes.
16-1051

Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Board” means the Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board.

(2)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(3)

“Domestic violence fatality” means:

(A)

A homicide under any of the following circumstances:

(i)

The alleged perpetrator and victim resided together at any time;

(ii)

The alleged perpetrator and victim have a child in common;

(iii)

The alleged perpetrator and victim were married, divorced, separated, or had a romantic relationship, not necessarily including a sexual relationship;

(iv)

The alleged perpetrator is or was married to, divorced, or separated from, or in a romantic relationship, not necessarily including a sexual relationship, with a person who is or was married to, divorced, or separated from, or in a romantic relationship, not necessarily including a sexual relationship, with the victim;

(v)

The alleged perpetrator had been stalking the victim;

(vi)

The victim filed a petition for a protective order against the alleged perpetrator at any time;

(vii)

The victim resided in the same household, was present at the workplace of, was in proximity of, or was related by blood or affinity to a person who experienced or was threatened with domestic violence by the alleged perpetrator; or

(viii)

The victim or the perpetrator was or is a child, parent, sibling, grandparent, aunt, uncle, or cousin of a person in a relationship that is described within this subsection.

(B)

A suicide of an individual where there were implications that the individual was the victim of domestic violence prior to his or her suicide, including the following circumstances:

(i)

The victim had applied for or received a protection order within the 2-year period preceding the suicide;

(ii)

The victim had undergone counseling or treatment as a result of being the victim of domestic violence within the 2-year period preceding the suicide; or

(iii)

The victim had reported to the police that he or she had been the victim of domestic violence within the 2-year period preceding the suicide.

(4)

“Protection order” means an injunction or other order, whether temporary or final, issued by a tribunal for the purpose of preventing violent or threatening acts or harassment against, contact or communication with, or physical proximity to, another individual.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(c), 50 DCR 320